Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1021
Electrology, defined.

Electrology means the art and practice relating to the removal of hair from normal skin of the human body by electrolysis.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-356.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 283.